Maryland, session 2025, SB0480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–704.4.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Social cost of greenhouse gases” means the most recent social cost of
greenhouse gases adopted by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
4–323. RESERVED.
4–324. RESERVED.
PART IV. STATE PURCHASE OF ENERGY.
4–325.
(A) IN THIS PART THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMITTEE” MEANS THE MARYLAND GREEN PURCHASING
COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 14–410 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(C) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE CLEAN ENERGY PROCUREMENT PROGRAM.
(D) “SOCIAL COST OF GREENHOUSE GASES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–704.4 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
4–326.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMITTEE, THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND,
AND THE MARYLAND CLEAN ENERGY CENTER, SHALL ESTABLISH A CLEAN ENERGY
PROCUREMENT PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROCURE BIOGAS FOR USE AS A
FUEL IN THE STATE’S TRANSPORTATION AND BUILDING SECTORS TO EVALUATE THE
ENVIRONMENTAL AND ECONOMIC BENEFITS AND COSTS OF REPLACING FOSSIL
NATURAL GAS WITH BIOGAS, ON A SHORT–TERM AND LONG–TERM BASIS, IN

SENATE BILL 480 3
FURTHERANCE OF THE STATE’S NET–ZERO STATEWIDE GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS REDUCTION GOALS.
(C) (1) UNDER THE PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE COMMITTEE, THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND, AND THE
MARYLAND CLEAN ENERGY CENTER:
(I) SHALL ISSUE A COMPETITIVE SEALED PROCUREMENT
SOLICITATION FOR BIOGAS; AND
(II) MAY ENTER INTO AT LEAST ONE CONTRACT TO PROCURE
BIOGAS.
(2) WHEN ISSUING THE INVITATION FOR BIDS UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TAKE INTO CONSIDERATION:
(I) THE COST–EFFECTIVENESS OF THE ADOPTION OF BIOGAS;
(II) THE SOCIAL COST OF GREENHOUSE GASES; AND
(III) THE STATE’S CLIMATE COMMITMENTS UNDER § 2–1204.2
OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(3) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, BIOGAS PROCURED THROUGH A CONTRACT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE GENERATED IN THE STATE.
(II) IF SUFFICIENT BIOGAS GENERATED IN THE STATE IS NOT
REASONABLY AVAILABLE FOR THE PROGRAM, THE STATE MAY PROCURE BIOGAS
FROM SOURCES OUTSIDE THE STATE.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) COLLECT DATA ON THE AVERAGE CONSUMPTION OF
NATURAL GAS IN THE STATE AND PROVIDE THE DATA TO THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM
OF MARYLAND TO DETERMINE WHETHER BIOGAS MAY SUPPORT THE STATE’S
CLIMATE COMMITMENTS UNDER § 2–1204.2 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE; AND
(II) ANALYZE THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND ECONOMIC COSTS AND
BENEFITS OF EXPANDING THE USE OF BIOGAS IN THE TRANSPORTATION AND
BUILDING SECTORS IN THE STATE.

SENATE BILL 480
(2) (I) THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND SHALL
COMPLETE A CARBON LIFECYCLE ANALYSIS OF BIOGAS AND PROVIDE THE RESULTS
TO THE DEPARTMENT AND THE COMMITTEE.
(II) THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM ESTABLISHED
UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE SHALL
REIMBURSE THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND FOR COSTS INCURRED TO
COMPLETE THE CARBON LIFECYCLE ANALYSIS REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(E) THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION APPLY ONLY IF:
(1) BIOGAS IS COMPETITIVELY PRICED;
(2) THE QUALITY OF THE BIOGAS IS SATISFACTORY FOR THE
INTENDED PURPOSE; AND
(3) BIOGAS IS READILY AVAILABLE.
(F) THE PROGRAM SHALL TERMINATE ON DECEMBER 31, 2028.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and 9 months and, at the
end of June 30, 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.